hu: Hűtőfolyadék-hőmérséklet érzékelő tömítési típusa: Alumínium alátét; Réz alátét; Tömítőgyűrű (roppantógyűrű); Tömítés; O-gyűrű; Kúpos menet (öntömítő); Menettömítő szükséges; Egyéb
es: Tipo de sello del sensor de temperatura de refrigerante: Arandela de aluminio; Arandela de cobre; Arandela de presión; Junta; Junta tórica; Rosca cónica (autosellante); Requiere sellador de roscas; Otro
vi: Loại gioăng cảm biến nhiệt độ chất làm mát: Vòng đệm nhôm; Vòng đệm đồng; Vòng đệm biến dạng; Miếng đệm; Ron chữ O; Ren côn (tự bịt kín); Cần dùng keo khóa ren; Khác
da: Kølevæsketemperaturfølerens tætningstype: Aluminiumspændeskive; Kobberspændeskive; Pakskive; Pakning; O-ring; Konisk gevind (selvtættende); Kræver gevindtætning; Anden
bg-BG: Тип уплътнение на сензора за температура на охладителната течност: Алуминиева шайба; Медна шайба; Дифтунга; Гарнитура; О-пръстен; Конусовидна резба (самоуплътняваща се); Изисква уплътнител за резби; Друг
ko: 냉각수 온도 센서 밀폐 유형: 알루미늄 와셔; 구리 와셔; 크러시 와셔; 개스킷; O링; 테이퍼드 나사산(자가 밀봉); 나사산 밀봉제 필요; 기타
de: Dichtungstyp für Kühlmitteltemperatursensor: Aluminium-Dichtring; Kupfer-Dichtring; Quetschdichtring; Dichtung; O-Ring; Kegelgewinde (selbstdichtend); Gewindedichtmittel erforderlich; Sonstige
lt-LT: Aušinimo skysčio temperatūros jutiklių sandariklio tipas: Aliumininė poveržlė; Varinė poveržlė; Gniuždoma poveržlė; Tarpiklis; O žiedas; Kūginis sriegis (savisandaris); Būtinas sriegių sandariklis; Kita
cs: Typ těsnění snímače teploty chladicí kapaliny: Hliníková podložka; Měděná podložka; Deformační podložka; Těsnění; O-kroužek; Kuželový závit (samotěsnicí); Vyžaduje těsnění závitu; Jiné
hr-HR: Vrsta brtve za senzor temperature rashladne tekućine: Aluminijska podloška; Bakrena podloška; Deformabilna podloška; Brtva; O-prsten; Konusni navoj (samobrtveni); Potrebno brtvilo za navoje; Ostalo
zh-TW: 冷卻液溫度感測器密封類型: 鋁製墊圈; 銅製墊圈; 擠壓墊圈; 墊片; O 型環; 錐形螺紋 (自密封); 需使用螺紋密封劑; 其他
tr: Soğutma sıvısı sıcaklık sensörü conta tipi: Alüminyum pul; Bakır pul; Ezilebilir pul; Conta; O-ring; Konik dişli (kendinden sızdırmaz); Diş sızdırmazlık maddesi gerektirir; Diğer
zh-CN: 冷却液温度传感器密封类型: 铝垫圈; 铜垫圈; 挤压垫圈; 密封垫; O 型圈; 锥形螺纹（自密封）; 需要螺纹密封胶; 其他
sv: Typ av temperatursensortätning för kylvätska: Aluminiumbricka; Kopparbricka; Tätbricka; Packning; O-ring; Konisk gänga (självtätande); Gängtätning krävs; Annan
el: Τύπος στεγανοποίησης του αισθητήρα θερμοκρασίας ψυκτικού υγρού: Ροδέλα αλουμινίου; Χάλκινη ροδέλα; Ροδέλα σύνθλιψης; Φλάντζα; Δακτύλιος O-ring; Κωνικό σπείρωμα (αυτοσφραγιζόμενο); Απαιτείται στεγανωτικό σπειρώματος; Άλλο
nb: Forseglingstype for kjølevæsketemperatursensor: Aluminiumsskive; Kobberskive; Tetningsskive; Pakning; O-ring; Konisk gjenge (selvtettende); Gjengetetning kreves; Annet
pt-PT: Tipo de vedação do sensor de temperatura do líquido de refrigeração: Anilha de alumínio; Anilha de cobre; Anilha de esmagamento; Junta; O-ring; Rosca cónica (autovedante); Necessário vedante de rosca; Outro
pt-BR: Tipo de vedação do sensor de temperatura do líquido de arrefecimento: Arruela de alumínio; Arruela de cobre; Arruela de compressão; Junta; Anel de vedação (O-ring); Rosca cônica (autovedante); Requer vedante de rosca; Outro
en: Coolant temperature sensor seal type: Aluminum washer; Copper washer; Crush washer; Gasket; O-ring; Tapered thread (self-sealing); Thread sealant required; Other
th: ประเภทซีลเซ็นเซอร์อุณหภูมิน้ำหล่อเย็น: แหวนรองอะลูมิเนียม; แหวนรองทองแดง; แหวนรองแบบบีบอัด; ปะเก็น; โอริง; เกลียวเรียว (ซีลในตัว); ต้องใช้น้ำยาซีลเกลียว; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ tesnenia snímača teploty chladiacej kvapaliny: Hliníková podložka; Medená podložka; Deformačná podložka; Tesnenie; O-krúžok; Kužeľový závit (samotesniaci); Vyžaduje sa tesniaci tmel na závity; Iné
nl: Type afdichting koelvloeistoptemperatuursensor: Aluminium sluitring; Koperen sluitring; Knelring; Pakking; O-ring; Conische schroefdraad (zelfdichtend); Schroefdraadafdichting vereist; Overig
fi: Jäähdytysnesteen lämpötila-anturin tiivistystyyppi: Alumiinialuslevy; Kuparialuslevy; Murskautuva aluslevy; Tasotiiviste; O-rengas; Kartiokierre (itsetiivistyvä); Vaatii kierretiivisteen; Muu
pl: Typ uszczelnienia czujnika temperatury płynu chłodzącego: Podkładka aluminiowa; Podkładka miedziana; Podkładka zgniatana; Uszczelka; O-ring; Gwint stożkowy (samouszczelniający); Wymagany uszczelniacz do gwintów; Inny
ru: Тип уплотнения датчика температуры охлаждающей жидкости: Алюминиевая шайба; Медная шайба; Сминаемая шайба; Прокладка; Уплотнительное кольцо; Коническая резьба (самоуплотняющаяся); Требуется герметик для резьбы; Другое
sl-SI: Vrsta tesnila senzorja temperature hladilne tekočine: Aluminijasta podložka; Bakrena podložka; Tesnilna podložka; Tesnilo; O-tesnilo; Stožčasti navoj (samotesnilni); Potrebna je tesnilna masa za navoje; Drugo
it: Tipo di guarnizione del sensore temperatura del liquido di raffreddamento: Rondella in alluminio; Rondella in rame; Rondella deformabile; Guarnizione; O-ring; Filettatura conica (autosigillante); Richiede sigillante per filettature; Altro
ja: 冷却水温度センサーシールタイプ: アルミニウムワッシャー; 銅ワッシャー; クラッシュワッシャー; ガスケット; Oリング; テーパーネジ (セルフシール); ネジシール剤が必要; その他
ro-RO: Tipul de etanșare a senzorului de temperatură al lichidului de răcire: Șaibă din aluminiu; Șaibă din cupru; Șaibă deformabilă; Garnitură; Inel O; Filet conic (cu autoetanșare); Necesită pastă de etanșare pentru filet; Altele
fr: Capteur de température du liquide de refroidissement à joint d'étanchéité: Rondelle en aluminium; Rondelle en cuivre; Rondelle déformable; Joint; Joint torique; Filetage conique (auto-étanche); Pâte d'étanchéité pour filetage requise; Autre